Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.070

National crime information center interstate identification index.

The section shall be the sole recipient of arrest and fingerprint forms described in RCW 10.98.060, fingerprint forms described in RCW 43.43.760, and disposition reports for forwarding to the federal bureau of investigation as required for participation in the national crime information center interstate identification index. The section shall comply with national crime information center interstate identification index regulations to maintain availability of out-of-state criminal history information.

[ 1984 c 17 s 7.]